Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-130
Counties; maintain office and service facilities; review by department.

(1) Until June 30, 2028, counties shall maintain, at no additional cost to the Department of Health and Human Services, office and service facilities used for the administration of the public assistance programs as such facilities existed on April 1, 1983.

(2) The county board of any county may request in writing that the department review office and service facilities provided by the county for the department to determine if the department is able to reduce or eliminate office and service facilities within the county. The department shall respond in writing to such request within thirty days after receiving the request. The final decision with respect to maintaining, reducing, or eliminating office and service facilities in such county shall be made by the department, and the county may reduce or eliminate office and service facilities if authorized by such final decision.

Laws 1982, LB 602, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 21;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 289;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 238;

Laws 2011, LB234, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 9.